Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.050

Duplicate for lost or destroyed license or certificate—Certified documents—Fees.

In the event that a license or certificate issued by the department is lost or destroyed, the person to whom it was issued may obtain a duplicate thereof upon furnishing proof of such fact satisfactory to the department and the payment of a fee determined by the secretary.

In the event any person desires any certified document to which he or she is entitled, he or she shall receive the same upon payment of a fee determined by the secretary.

[ 2011 c 336 s 494; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 419; 1984 c 153 s 9; 1963 c 38 s 6; 1935 c 98 s 9; RRS s 10145-1. FORMER PART OF SECTION: 1935 c 98 s 10; RRS s 10145-2, now codified as RCW 18.64.055.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.